Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.410.043

School counselor certification.

A school counselor is a professional educator who holds a valid school counselor certification as defined by the professional educator standards board. The purpose and role of the school counselor is to plan, organize, and deliver a comprehensive school guidance and counseling program that personalizes education and supports, promotes, and enhances the academic, personal, social, and career development of all students, based on the national standards for school counseling programs of the American school counselor association.

[ 2007 c 175 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2007 c 175: "The legislature finds that the professional school counselor is a certificated educator with unique qualifications and skills to address all students' academic, personal, social, and career development needs. School counselors serve a vital role in maximizing student achievement, supporting a safe learning environment, and addressing the needs of all students through prevention and intervention programs that are part of a comprehensive school counseling program. The legislature further finds that current state statutes fail to mention anything about school counselors. Therefore, the legislature intends to codify into law the importance and the role of school counselors in public schools." [ 2007 c 175 s 1.]